Arkansas, session 2025, HB1201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Arkansas Department of Transportation for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees and the maximum annual salary
for such employees; and no greater salary than that established herein shall
be paid to any employee from appropriations hereinafter made for said
department. The annual salaries to be paid to each employee authorized herein
shall be determined by the Arkansas State Highway Commission within the
limitations as set out in this Section and the funds and the appropriations
made available for such purposes. All positions established herein shall be
exempt from the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act
(Arkansas Code § 21-5-201, et seq.), or its successor, but shall not be
exempt from the provisions of the Regular Salaries Procedures and
Restrictions Act. Provided further that the salaries for the pay period
beginning June 2025 and ending July 2025 can be paid from the salaries and
overtime authorized for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.
*WFP015*
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) Director 1 $276,967
(2) Chief Engineer - Preconstruction 1 $242,365
(3) Chief Engineer - Operations 1 $242,365
(4) Chief - Administration 1 $242,365
(5) Assistant Chief - Administration 1 $220,331
(6) Assistant Chief Engineer - Construction 1 $220,331
(7) Assistant Chief Engineer - Design 1 $220,331
(8) Assistant Chief Engineer - Maintenance 1 $220,331
(9) Assistant Chief Engineer - Planning 1 $220,331
(10) Assistant Chief Engineer - Program Deliv 1 $220,331
(11) Chief Fiscal Officer 1 $200,302
(12) Chief Legal Counsel 1 $200,302
(13) Chief of Highway Police 1 $200,302
(14) State Construction Engineer 1 $200,302
(15) State Maintenance Engineer 1 $200,302
(16) Alternative Delivery Administrator 1 $182,092
(17) ASHERS Executive Secretary 1 $182,092
(18) Chief Auditor 1 $182,092
(19) District Engineer 10 $182,092
(20) Division Head 18 $182,092
(21) Special Projects Coordinator 1 $182,092
SALARY LEVEL XX $165,538
(22) Administrative Officer Pool 10 $165,538
Administrative Officer V $165,538
Administrative Officer IV $148,551
Administrative Officer III $126,951
Administrative Officer II $112,440
Administrative Officer I $99,340
(23) Alternative Delivery Manager 1 $165,538
(24) Assistant Division Head 24 $165,538
(25) Data Governance Officer 1 $165,538
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
(26) Deputy Chief Counsel 1 $165,538
(27) District Construction Engineer 11 $165,538
(28) District Maintenance Engineer 11 $165,538
(29) Estimating & Scheduling Administrator 1 $165,538
(30) Governmental Relations Officer 1 $165,538
SALARY LEVEL XIX $157,454
(31) Engineering Pool 295 $157,454
Staff Engineer $157,454
Senior Engineer $134,759
Advanced Engineer $119,514
Engineer $105,718
Engineering Technician $92,215
(32) Enterprise System Administrator 1 $157,454
(33) Legal and Legislative Pool 11 $157,454
Senior Staff Attorney $157,454
Staff Attorney $148,551
Attorney II $134,759
Attorney I $126,951
Legal Administrator $126,951
Legislative Specialist $126,951
Legislative Analyst $112,440
(34) Police Supervisory Pool 56 $157,454
Arkansas Highway Police Captain $157,454
Arkansas Highway Police Lieutenant $148,551
Arkansas Highway Police Sergeant $134,759
Motor Carrier Safety Inspector $134,759
(35) Section Head Pool 43 $157,454
Section Head - Technical & IT $157,454
Section Head $148,551
(36) Senior Right of Way Project Manager 2 $157,454
(37) Staff GIS & Mapping Administrator 1 $157,454
(38) Staff Land Surveyor 1 $157,454
SALARY LEVEL XVIII $148,551
(39) Equipment and Procurement Officer 1 $148,551
(40) Materials Specifications Coordinator 1 $148,551
(41) Media Communications Manager 1 $148,551
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
(42) Program Management Database Admin 1 $148,551
(43) TSMO Data Coordinator 1 $148,551
SALARY LEVEL XVII $134,759
(44) Assistant Enterprise System Admin 1 $134,759
(45) Assistant GIS - Mapping Admin 1 $134,759
(46) Assistant Section Head Pool 15 $134,759
Assistant Section Head - Technical & IT $134,759
Assistant Section Head $126,951
(47) Information Technology Pool 54 $134,759
IT Administrator $134,759
HR Systems Administrator $126,951
IT Analyst $126,951
Senior Maintenance Mngmnt System Admin $126,951
Assistant HR Systems Administrator $112,440
Fleet Management System Administrator $112,440
IT Coordinator $112,440
Maintenance Management System Admin $112,440
IT Specialist $99,340
IT Technician $85,592
(48) Laboratory Facility Manager 1 $134,759
(49) Planning Pool 34 $134,759
Traffic Safety Data Management Coord $134,759
Public Transportation Grants Officer $126,951
Public Transportation Program Mngmnt Off $126,951
Public Transportation Safety & Secur Off $126,951
Railroad Crossing Coordinator $126,951
Senior Traffic Safety Analyst $126,951
Senior Transportation Planner $126,951
Advanced Traffic Safety Analyst $112,440
Assistant Railroad Crossing Coordinator $112,440
Public Transportation Program Manager $112,440
Safety Information Coordinator $112,440
Transportation Planner $112,440
Public Transportation Asset Specialist $99,340
Public Transportation Program Spec $99,340
Traffic Safety Analyst $99,340
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
Planning Contract Specialist $85,592
Traffic Safety Technician $85,592
(50) Right of Way Project Manager 1 $134,759
SALARY LEVEL XVI $126,951
(51) Accounting and Financial Pool 42 $126,951
Consultant Specialist $126,951
Contract Auditor $126,951
Fiscal Coordinator $126,951
IT Auditor $126,951
Reviewing Auditor $126,951
Senior Accountant $126,951
Senior Retirement Administrator (ASHERS) $126,951
Accountant $112,440
Assistant Fiscal Coordinator $112,440
Financial Analyst $112,440
Retirement Administrator $112,440
Staff Auditor $112,440
Contract Specialist $99,340
Maintenance Inventory Coordinator $99,340
(52) Administrative Support Supervisory Pool 31 $126,951
Creative Services Manager $126,951
Office Manager $112,440
Purchasing Manager $112,440
Mail & Supply Supervisor $99,340
Records Supervisor $99,340
Storeroom Supervisor $99,340
(53) Bridge Management and Inspection Pool 71 $126,951
Statewide Bridge Inspector $126,951
Senior Bridge Inspector $119,514
Bridge Management Analyst $112,440
Advanced Bridge Inspector $105,718
Bridge Management Specialist $99,340
Bridge Inspector $92,215
(54) Civil Rights Pool 9 $126,951
Lead Civil Rights Coordinator $126,951
Civil Rights Coordinator $112,440
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
DBE Supportive Services Specialist $99,340
EEO Specialist $99,340
OJT Supportive Services Specialist $99,340
DBE Program Specialist $85,592
(55) Environmental Pool 41 $126,951
Lead Cultural Resources Specialist $126,951
Lead Environmental Impact Analyst $126,951
Lead GIS-Data Management Specialist $126,951
Lead Natural Resources Specialist $126,951
Lead Public Involvement Specialist $126,951
Advanced Cultural Resources Specialist $112,440
Advanced Environmental Impact Analyst $112,440
Advanced GIS-Data Management Specialist $112,440
Advanced Natural Resources Specialist $112,440
Advanced Public Involvement Specialist $112,440
Cultural Resources Specialist $99,340
Environmental Impact Analyst $99,340
GIS-Data Management Specialist $99,340
Natural Resources Specialist $99,340
Public Involvement Specialist $99,340
Environmental Technician $85,592
(56) Geodetic Surveys Coordinator 1 $126,951
(57) Field Construction Pool 370 $126,951
Senior Construction Project Coordinator $126,951
Construction Project Coordinator $119,514
Senior Inspector $105,718
Construction Materials Inspector $92,215
District Surveys Coordinator $92,215
Inspector $92,215
Advanced Construction Aide $79,433
District Surveys Technician $79,433
Construction Aide $66,857
(58) Geospatial Pool 22 $126,951
Senior Geospatial Specialist $126,951
Program Management GIS Analyst $112,440
Advanced Geospatial Specialist $112,440
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
Geospatial Specialist $99,340
GIS Technician $85,592
(59) Land Surveyor 5 $126,951
(60) Lead Alternative Project Delivery Coord 1 $126,951
(61) Local Technical Assistance Program Mngr 1 $126,951
(62) Maintenance Professionals Pool 8 $126,951
Traffic Services Specialist $126,951
Lead Agronomist $119,514
Maintenance Management Coordinator $119,514
Sign Developer/Designer $119,514
Traffic Investigator $112,440
Agronomist $105,718
(63) Maintenance Supervisor Pool 316 $126,951
District Maintenance Superintendent $126,951
HBM Superintendent $126,951
Area Maintenance Supervisor $119,514
Bridge Maintenance Superintendent $119,514
HBM Supervisor $119,514
Pavement Profiling Superintendent $119,514
Sealing Superintendent $119,514
Signing Superintendent $119,514
Sign Shop Supervisor $119,514
Special Maintenance Superintendent $119,514
Striping Superintendent $119,514
Assistant Maintenance Supervisor $105,718
Assistant Signing Superintendent $105,718
Assistant Striping Superintendent $105,718
Ferry Boat Supervisor $105,718
Sign Crew Supervisor $105,718
Assistant Sign Shop Supervisor $99,340
(64) Photogrammetry Pool 9 $126,951
Photogrammetric Specialist $126,951
Advanced Photogrammetry Technician $112,440
Photogrammetry Technician $99,340
Aerial Photographer $72,874
(65) Preconstruction Pool 16 $126,951
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
Advanced Program Management Specialist $126,951
Federal Programs Coordinator $126,951
Program Management Data Specialist $126,951
Bicycle-Pedestrian Coordinator $112,440
Program Management Specialist $112,440
Local Programs Technician $99,340
Program Management Technician $99,340
(66) Research Support Supervisor 1 $126,951
(67) Right of Way Pool 99 $126,951
Broadband Utility Coordinator $126,951
Relocation Specialist $126,951
Reviewing Appraiser $126,951
ROW Acquisition Specialist $126,951
ROW Engineering Specialist $126,951
Utilities Specialist $126,951
Utilities Inspection Coordinator $119,514
Advanced District Permit Officer $112,440
Closing Agent $112,440
Lead Abstractor $112,440
Lead Beautification Coordinator $112,440
Lead Realty Appraiser $112,440
Lead Relocation Coordinator $112,440
Lead ROW Acquisition Agent $112,440
Lead ROW Billing Coordinator $112,440
Lead ROW Plans Designer $112,440
Lead Utilities Coordinator $112,440
Property Manager $112,440
Abstractor $99,340
Beautification Coordinator $99,340
District Permit Officer $99,340
Realty Appraiser $99,340
Relocation Coordinator $99,340
ROW Acquisition Agent $99,340
ROW Billing Coordinator $99,340
Utilities Coordinator $99,340
ROW Plans Designer $85,592
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
Utility Billing Coordinator $85,592
Abstractor Aide $72,874
(68) Roadway Design Review Coordinator 1 $126,951
(69) Skilled Trades Supervisory Pool 32 $126,951
Facilities Management Superintendent $126,951
Fleet Manager $126,951
Central Office Facilities Manager $112,440
Equipment Maintenance Supervisor $112,440
Equipment Specialist $112,440
Facilities Management Project Coord $105,718
Shop Supervisor $105,718
(70) Surveys Technical Coordinator 1 $126,951
(71) System Information Pool 37 $126,951
Asset Management & Pavement Data Analyst $126,951
System Information Data Specialist $126,951
Advanced Data Quality Management Analyst $112,440
Geophysical Data Analyst $112,440
System Information Analyst $112,440
Assistant Geophysical Data Analyst $99,340
Data Quality Management Analyst $99,340
Lead Data Collection Technician $99,340
Lead System Information Technician $99,340
Advanced Data Collection Technician $92,215
Advanced System Information Technician $92,215
Data Collection Technician $85,592
System Information Technician $85,592
(72) System Information Supervisor 2 $126,951
SALARY LEVEL XV $119,514
(73) Construction Systems Specialist 1 $119,514
(74) Creative Professionals Pool 11 $119,514
Senior Creative Professional $119,514
Advanced Graphic Design Specialist $112,440
Community Relations Coordinator $112,440
Digital Content Coordinator $105,718
External Information Coordinator $105,718
Photographer $105,718
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
Publications Specialist $105,718
Videographer $105,718
Writer $105,718
Graphic Design Specialist $99,340
(75) District Materials Supervisor 11 $119,514
(76) Geologist Pool 2 $119,514
Advanced Geologist $119,514
Geologist $105,718
(77) Traffic Safety Supervisory Pool 10 $119,514
ITS Operations Supervisor $119,514
TMC Manager $119,514
Traffic Operations Supervisor $119,514
Assistant ITS Operations Supervisor $105,718
Assistant TMC Manager $105,718
Assistant Traffic Operations Supervisor $105,718
SALARY LEVEL XIV $112,440
(78) Construction Earthwork Coordinator 1 $112,440
(79) Designer Pool 17 $112,440
Advanced Designer $112,440
Advanced Estimator $112,440
Designer $99,340
Estimator $99,340
Design Technician $85,592
(80) Geotechnical Drill Crew Supervisor 3 $112,440
(81) Human Resources Pool 36 $112,440
Classification & Compensation Specialist $112,440
Employee Relations Coordinator $112,440
Safety Program Coordinator $112,440
Senior Health & Safety Officer $112,440
Senior HR Specialist $112,440
Talent Acquisition Coordinator $112,440
Workforce Development Coordinator $112,440
Health & Safety Officer $99,340
HR Specialist $99,340
HR Systems Technician $99,340
Workforce Development Specialist $99,340
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
HR Generalist $85,592
Training Coordinator $85,592
Wellness Coordinator $85,592
(82) Materials Testing Pool 29 $112,440
Lead Chemist $112,440
Laboratory Coordinator $105,718
Chemist $92,215
Steel Fabrication Inspector $92,215
Testing Equipment Specialist $92,215
Materials Stockroom Coordinator $85,592
District Laboratory Technician $79,433
Senior Materials Technician $79,433
Materials Technician $66,857
(83) Police and Security Pool 151 $112,440
Arkansas Highway Police Corporal $112,440
Arkansas Highway Police Ptrl Off 1st Cls $99,340
Arkansas Highway Police Patrol Officer $85,592
Motor Carrier Safety Auditor $85,592
Arkansas Highway Police Security Super $79,433
Arkansas Highway Police Security Guard $66,857
Security Guard $56,274
(84) Research Pool 6 $112,440
Librarian $112,440
Research Financial Analyst $112,440
Advanced Research Assistant $99,340
Research Assistant $85,592
(85) Surveys Crew Supervisor 12 $112,440
SALARY LEVEL XIII $105,718
(86) Construction Office Pool 76 $105,718
Advanced Subcontract Administrator $105,718
Estimates Analyst $105,718
Advanced Resident Office Technician $99,340
Subcontract Administrator $99,340
Construction Systems Technician $92,215
Resident Office Technician $85,592
Construction Office Specialist $79,433
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
Advanced Field Clerk $72,874
Estimates Technician $72,874
Field Clerk $66,857
(87) Emergency Management Pool 3 $105,718
Emergency Management Coordinator $105,718
Emergency Management Planner $92,215
Emergency Management Technician $79,433
SALARY LEVEL XII $99,340
(88) Administrative Support Pool 235 $99,340
Advanced Motor Carrier Safety Data Spec $99,340
Executive Assistant $99,340
Fuel Management Specialist $99,340
Legal Specialist $99,340
Maintenance Management Specialist $99,340
Maintenance Services Coordinator $99,340
Purchasing Specialist $99,340
Senior Permit Technician $99,340
Accounting Specialist $85,592
Administrative Assistant $85,592
Advanced Permit Technician $85,592
Bookkeeper $85,592
Legal Assistant $85,592
Motor Carrier Safety Data Specialist $85,592
Planning Technician $85,592
Retirement Specialist $85,592
Advanced Maintenance Services Spec $79,433
Lead Storeroom Assistant $79,433
Print Services Coordinator $79,433
Publications Technician $79,433
Accounting Assistant $72,874
Advanced District Clerk $72,874
Advanced Motor Carrier Safety Spec $72,874
Computer Technician $72,874
Fleet Management Analyst $72,874
HR Assistant $72,874
Legal Tech Support $72,874
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
Office Assistant $72,874
Permit Technician $72,874
Purchasing Clerk $72,874
Records Specialist $72,874
District Clerk $66,857
Legal Aide $66,857
Mail & Supply Assistant $66,857
Storeroom Assistant $66,857
Data Entry Operator $61,337
Motor Carrier Safety Specialist $61,337
Office Aide $61,337
Records Technician $61,337
Mail Courier $56,274
Parts Runner $56,274
(89) Communications and ITS Pool 28 $99,340
Senior ITS Specialist $99,340
Senior Traffic Operations Specialist $99,340
ITS Specialist $92,215
Traffic Operations Specialist $92,215
(90) Skilled Trades Pool 179 $99,340
Fleet Electronics & Diagnostics Tech $99,340
Senior Skilled Tradesperson $99,340
Advanced Skilled Tradesperson $92,215
CNC Machinist $92,215
AHP Technician $85,592
Electrician $85,592
Electronics Technician $85,592
Mechanic $85,592
Plumber $85,592
Body Repairer & Painter $79,433
Carpenter $79,433
Electrical Plumbing & Mech Repairer $79,433
Welder $79,433
Skilled Trades Apprentice $66,857
Skilled Trades Trainee $56,274
(91) Surveys Pool 41 $99,340
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
Advanced Surveys Technician $99,340
Surveys Research Technician $85,592
Surveys Technician $85,592
Advanced Surveys Aide $72,874
Surveys Aide $61,337
SALARY LEVEL XI $92,215
(92) District Maintenance Pool 1,687 $92,215
Crew Leader $92,215
Ferry Boat Pilot $79,433
Janitorial Staff Coordinator $79,433
Lead Bridge Repairer $79,433
Maintenance Specialist $79,433
Advanced Area Headquarters Attendant $72,874
Landscape Technician $72,874
Tractor Trailer Driver $72,874
Area Headquarters Attendant $66,857
Bridge Repairer $66,857
Lead Station Attendant $66,857
Maintenance Aide II $66,857
Pilot - Deck Hand $66,857
Rest Area Attendant II $66,857
Sign Erector II $66,857
District Caretaker II $61,337
Rest Area Attendant $61,337
Sign Erector $61,337
Deck Hand $56,274
District Caretaker $56,274
Janitor II $56,274
Maintenance Aide I $56,274
Station Attendant $56,274
General Laborer $52,127
Janitor $52,127
(93) Geotechnical Pool 9 $92,215
Senior Geotechnical Aide $92,215
Geotechnical Specialist $85,592
Advanced Geotechnical Aide $79,433
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
Geotechnical Aide $66,857
(94) Traffic Management Center Pool 35 $92,215
Senior Customer Service Represent $92,215
Senior TMC Operator $92,215
Senior Communications Operator $79,433
TMC Operator $79,433
Communications Operator $66,857
Customer Service Representative $66,857
SALARY LEVEL X $85,592
(95) Sign Shop Pool 9 $85,592
Sign Fabrication Specialist $85,592
Advanced Sign Fabricator $72,874
Sign Fabricator $61,337
(96) Statewide Maintenance Pool 76 $85,592
Highway Zoner $85,592
Lead Heavy Bridge Repairer $85,592
Statewide Maintenance Specialist $85,592
Heavy Bridge Repairer $72,874
Statewide Maintenance Aide II $72,874
Statewide Maintenance Aide I $61,337
SALARY LEVEL IX $79,433
SALARY LEVEL VIII $72,874
SALARY LEVEL VII $66,857
SALARY LEVEL VI $61,337
SALARY LEVEL V $56,274
(97) Temporary Employee Pool 144 $56,274
Senior Intern $56,274
Advanced Intern $52,127
Intern $47,364
Extra Help $43,453
Seasonal Employee $39,865
SALARY LEVEL IV $52,127
SALARY LEVEL III $47,364
SALARY LEVEL II $43,453
SALARY LEVEL I $39,865
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 4,558
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas Department of Transportation, to be payable from the State
Highway and Transportation Department Fund, for the administration and
operation of the Arkansas Department of Transportation; for construction,
reconstruction, maintenance, betterments, replacement, and operation of
roads, bridges, ferries, and all other facilities by the Arkansas Department
of Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $270,000,000
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 130,000,000
(03) OVERTIME 10,000,000
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 270,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 500,000
(C) PROF. FEES 120,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,800,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) TRANSPORTATION ASSISTANCE GRANTS & AID 70,000,000
(06) DEBT SERVICE 50,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,720,500,000

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE AID ROADS PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Department of Transportation, to be payable
from the State Aid Road Fund, for construction, reconstruction, and
improvement of roads on the State Aid Road System as authorized by Arkansas
Code Title 27, Chapter 72, for transfer of engineering and other expenses to
the State Highway and Transportation Department Fund, and for refunds to
counties, by the Arkansas Department of Transportation for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $4,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) GRANTS AND AID 30,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $34,000,000

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS PUBLIC TRANSIT TRUST FUND PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Department of Transportation,
to be payable from the Arkansas Public Transit Trust Fund, for acquiring
federal matching funds for the purchase of public transportation vehicles,
public transit equipment or facilities, and for the operation of the United
States Department of Transportation Federal Transit Administration Assistance
Programs, by the Arkansas Department of Transportation for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS AND AID $7,000,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - STATE AID STREETS PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Department of Transportation, to be payable
from the State Aid Street Fund, for construction, reconstruction, and
improvement of roads and expenses of state aid for municipalities in the
State Aid Street System as authorized by Arkansas Code Title 27, Chapter 72,
for transfer of engineering and other expenses to the State Highway and
Transportation Department Fund, and for refunds to municipalities, by the
Arkansas Department of Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $2,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) GRANTS AND AID 32,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $34,000,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS FOUR-LANE HIGHWAY CONSTRUCTION AND
IMPROVEMENT BOND ACCOUNT PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Arkansas Department of Transportation, to be payable from the State Highway
and Transportation Department Fund, for repayment of bonds, transfer to
trustees for debt service, bond redemption, investment in accordance with
applicable resolutions or trust indentures, and funding additional four-lane
highway construction and improvements, as provided in Amendment 91 of the
Constitution of the State of Arkansas, by the Arkansas Department of
Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $5,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 30,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 400,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $435,000,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - ROAD AND BRIDGE REPAIR, MAINTENANCE, AND
GRANTS PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Department of
Transportation, to be payable from the Road and Bridge Repair, Maintenance,
and Grants Fund, for road and bridge repair, maintenance, and grants for
damages resulting from trucks and other heavy machinery used in the
extraction of natural gas, by the Arkansas Department of Transportation for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
(01) ROAD AND BRIDGE REPAIR, MAINTENANCE
AND GRANTS TO POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS $5,000,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - COMMERCIAL TRUCK SAFETY AND EDUCATION
PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Department of
Transportation, to be payable from the Commercial Truck Safety and Education
Fund, for personal services, maintenance and operating expenses, capital
outlay, and grants for improving the safety of the commercial trucking
industry through cooperative public and private programs focusing on
increased enforcement, regulatory compliance, industry training, and
educational programs to ensure the safe movement of goods on state highways,
by the Arkansas Department of Transportation for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $100,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) GRANTS AND AID 6,900,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $7,000,000

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Department of Transportation, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for use in the
preparation of project applications, program developments, and as matching
monies for the United States Department of Transportation funds and other
federal funds, and for capital improvements to, and operating assistance for,
the Public Transportation Programs serving transportation-dependent persons,
by the Arkansas Department of Transportation for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
NO. 2025-2026
(01) DEPARTMENT FUNDING ASSISTANCE GRANTS
TO RURAL & URBAN TRANSPORTATION AGENCIES $350,000

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - NOAA WEATHER WARNING SYSTEM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Department of Transportation, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for operating expenses
of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Weather Warning Radio
System, by the Arkansas Department of Transportation for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $4,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,000

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - ARKANSAS STATE HIGHWAY EMPLOYEES'
RETIREMENT SYSTEM. There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Department
of Transportation, to be payable from the Arkansas State Highway Employees'
Retirement System Fund, for annuities, investments, benefits, refunds, and
expenses of the Arkansas Department of Transportation - Arkansas State
Highway Employees' Retirement System for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $1,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 15,000,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) BENEFITS AND SYSTEM EXPENSES 230,000,000
(03) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS 4,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $250,000,000

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - INTERMODAL FACILITIES GRANTS PROGRAM.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Arkansas Department of Transportation,
to be payable from the State Highway and Transportation Department Fund, for
grants to regional intermodal facilities, by the Arkansas Department of
Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INTERMODAL FACILITIES GRANTS $525,000

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - TRANSPORTATION RELATED RESEARCH AND
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT GRANT PROGRAM. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Arkansas Department of Transportation, to be payable from the Future
Transportation Research and Workforce Development Fund, for grants to
publicly funded institutions of higher education for transportation related
research or workforce development, by the Arkansas Department of
Transportation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) FUTURE TRANSPORTATION RESEARCH AND
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT FUND GRANTS $1,000,000

SECTION 14. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. TRANSFERS
AUTHORIZED. Any savings in the amount appropriated in the Operations
appropriation section for the Regular Salaries line item, Overtime line item,
Personal Services Matching line item, or any sub-item of the Maintenance and
General Operation line item, may be transferred by the Director of the
Arkansas Department of Transportation to any sub-item of the Maintenance and
General Operation line item, upon review by the Arkansas Legislative Council
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
or Joint Budget Committee and by notifying the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration and the Auditor of State to transfer said savings
to a specific sub-item of the Maintenance and General Operation line item and
make it available for said purpose during the then current fiscal year.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 15. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. PERSONAL
SERVICES MATCHING TRANSFER. Provided that in the event amounts appropriated
in the Personal Services Matching line item of the Operations appropriation
section are insufficient in the fiscal year to pay the amounts at the rates
stipulated by law to be paid for each of these items, an additional amount as
determined and requested by the Director of the Arkansas Department of
Transportation, and upon review by the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee, will be transferred by the Secretary of the Department of
Finance and Administration and the Auditor of State from the Maintenance and
General Operation line items to the Personal Services Matching line item of
the Operations appropriation section to enable the Arkansas Department of
Transportation to pay the required matching funds.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 16. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 17. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015

HB1201
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 18. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.



















01/22/2025 1:21:01 PM WFP015